Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1520
Owner of registered tank; petroleum release remedial action fee; amount.

(1) On each January 1, all owners of operating tanks registered in accordance with section 81-15,121 shall pay a petroleum release remedial action fee of ninety dollars to the State Fire Marshal for each registered tank.

(2) The State Fire Marshal shall remit the fees received pursuant to this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 20;

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 13;

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 30.